Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 1 General Provisions

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2003, Code Sections 31-35-1 through 31-35-3 were designated as Article 1 of Chapter 35 of Title 31.

31-35-1.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds and declares that, by reason of their employment, firefighters, emergency medical technicians, and public safety officers are required to work in the midst of and are subject to exposure to infectious diseases, especially hepatitis B and hepatitis C; that the United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention have estimated that 200,000 persons in the United States are infected each year with hepatitis B and of that number 25 percent become ill, 10,000 require hospitalization, and 5,000 die; that it is estimated that there are from 500,000 to 1,000,000 infectious hepatitis B carriers in the United States, of which up to 80 percent of such chronic carriers are unaware that they have hepatitis B and are capable of spreading it; that 3.9 million Americans are infected with chronic hepatitis C; that 350,000 to 450,000 new cases of chronic hepatitis C occur each year; that there is no known cure for hepatitis B or hepatitis C and for firefighters, emergency medical technicians, and public safety officers, there is no way of knowing who among those being helped at an accident, a fire, or any incident are hepatitis B or hepatitis C carriers. The General Assembly further finds and declares that all the aforementioned conditions exist and arise out of or in the course of such employment.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-35-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1780, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1499, § 2; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 31/HB 942.

31-35-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Emergency medical technician” means an emergency medical technician as defined in Code Section 31-11-2.

“Fire department” means a service group (paid or volunteer) that is organized and trained for the prevention and control of loss of life and property from fire or other emergency.

“Firefighter” means an individual who is assigned by a fire department to fire-fighting activity and is required to respond to alarms and perform emergency action at the location of a fire, a hazardous materials emergency, or other emergency incident.

“Public safety officer” means an individual sworn to enforce the criminal laws of this state or any county or municipality of this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-35-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1780, § 1.

31-35-3.
Voluntary vaccinations for hepatitis B; screening for hepatitis C.

Any active firefighter, emergency medical technician, or public safety officer who may be exposed to hepatitis B or hepatitis C during a period while the firefighter, emergency medical technician, or public safety officer is engaged in the performance of his or her duties shall at the request of the firefighter, emergency medical technician, or public safety officer be vaccinated for protection against hepatitis B or screened for exposure to hepatitis C. The cost, after the payment by any third-party payor, of such vaccination or screening shall be paid by the county, municipality, or other person or entity employing such firefighter, emergency medical technician, or public safety officer or by the governing authority of the county in the case of a volunteer firefighter.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-35-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1780, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1499, § 3.